Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-10,100
Schoolhouse; erection or improvement; equipment; vote required to approve.

The school board or board of education, upon being satisfied that all the requirements of section 79-1098 have been substantially complied with and that fifty-five percent of all votes cast at the election under such section are in favor of such tax, shall enter such proposition and all the proceedings had thereon upon the records of the school district and shall certify the special tax levy to the county clerk as other tax levies.

Laws 1935, c. 170, § 3, p. 624;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-135;

R.S.1943, § 79-146;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 63, p. 713;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-424;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 746;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 73.